Hawaii statutes.
§329-43.5 Prohibited acts related to drug
paraphernalia. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), it is unlawful
for any person to use, or to possess with intent to use, drug paraphernalia to
plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert,
produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain,
conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter. Any person who violates
this section is guilty of a class C felony and upon conviction may be
imprisoned pursuant to section 706-660 and, if appropriate as provided in
section 706-641, fined pursuant to section 706-640.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (e), it
is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or
manufacture with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing or under
circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant,
propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce,
process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject,
ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled
substance in violation of this chapter. Any person who violates this section
is guilty of a class C felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned pursuant to
section 706-660 and, if appropriate as provided in section 706-641, fined
pursuant to section 706-640.

(c) Any person eighteen years of age or over
who violates subsection (b) by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person or
persons under eighteen years of age who are at least three years younger than
that adult person is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be
imprisoned pursuant to section 706-660 and, if appropriate as provided in
section 706-641, fined pursuant to section 706-640.

(d) It is unlawful for any person to place in
any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement,
knowing or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the
purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of
objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any person who
violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and upon conviction may be
imprisoned pursuant to section 706-660 and, if appropriate as provided in
section 706-641, fined pursuant to section 706-640.

(e) Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to
a person who is authorized to:

(1) Acquire, possess, cultivate, use, distribute, or
transport marijuana pursuant to the definition of "medical use" under
section 329-121, while the person is facilitating the medical use of marijuana
by a qualifying patient; or

(2) Dispense, manufacture, or produce marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products pursuant to and in
compliance with chapter 329D, while the person is facilitating the
medical use of marijuana by a qualifying patient pursuant to part IX of chapter
329. [L 1988, c 259, §2; am L 2016, c 230, §6]

Cross References

Forfeitures, see §329-55.

Sale of sterile syringes for the prevention of disease, see
§325-21.

Case Notes

In a prosecution under subsection (b): of a merchant, jury
should be instructed that it must first find that the defendant-seller
delivered the object(s) in question to the buyer with the specific intent that
the object(s) be used with illegal drugs; trial court should provide jury with
an instruction enumerating all fourteen factors listed in the statutory
definition of drug paraphernalia. 75 H. 80, 856 P.2d 1246.

Subsection (b): not void for vagueness; contains mens rea
requirement of "intentionally"; mere fact that the buyer is actually
an undercover police officer, which fact is unknown to the defendant, cannot
render it "factually and legally" impossible that the defendant
should reasonably have known that the items sold would be used with illegal
drugs. 75 H. 80, 856 P.2d 1246.

No error in court failing to dismiss count against defendant
for possessing "everyday household items not intended or designed for use
as drug paraphernalia" as broad definition of drug paraphernalia and
multiple examples of such contraband enumerated in §329-1 weighed against
defendant's contention that the ordinary nature of the containers defendant
possessed did not involve the harm or evil sought to be avoided under this
section or amounted to extenuations that would not have been envisioned by the
legislature. 98 H. 196, 46 P.3d 498.

Legislature intended to impose penal sanctions for
constructive and actual possession of contraband items. 8 H. App. 610, 822
P.2d 23.

Insufficient evidence to support jury's verdict that
defendant possessed scale with intent to use it for any of the purposes stated
in subsection (a). 92 H. 472 (App.), 992 P.2d 741.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next